Utah statutes.
63G-7-904.   Indemnification of governmental entity by employee not required.

If a governmental entity pays all or part of a judgment, compromise, or settlement based on a claim against the governmental entity or an employee, the employee is not required to indemnify the governmental entity for the payment.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

